Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 5. Allocation of Highway Funds.

§ 33.2-351.
Definition of “allocation.”

For the purposes of this article, “allocation” means a commitment to expend funds available for construction during each fiscal year. Funds that cannot be expended as allocated within each fiscal year shall be identified as part of future commitments, and the reason for the failure to spend allocations shall be specifically included in the annual construction improvement program.

History.

1982, c. 418, § 33.1-23.01; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-352.
Asset management practices; report.

The Department shall develop asset management practices in the operation and maintenance of the systems of state highways. Such practices shall include a transparent methodology for the allocation of funds from the Highway Maintenance and Operating Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1530

to highway systems maintenance and operations programs, including the allocations among the highway construction districts and among the Interstate System and primary and secondary state highway systems.

The Commissioner of Highways shall advise the Board on or before June 30 of even-numbered years of performance targets and outcomes that are expected to be achieved, based on the funding identified for maintenance, over the biennium beginning July 1 of that year. In addition, not later than September 30 of even-numbered years, the Commissioner of Highways shall advise the Board on the Department’s accomplishments relative to the expected outcomes and budget expenditures for the biennium ending June 30 of that year and also advise the Board as to the methodology used to determine maintenance needs and the justification as to the maintenance funding by source.

History.

1985, c. 42, § 33.1-23.02; 2002, cc. 302, 570; 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 9; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 684.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684 added the second sentence in subsection A.

§ 33.2-353.
Commonwealth Transportation Board to develop and update Statewide Transportation Plan.

The Board shall, with the assistance of the Office of Intermodal Planning and Investment, conduct a comprehensive review of statewide transportation needs in a Statewide Transportation Plan setting forth assessment of capacity needs for all corridors of statewide significance, regional networks, and improvements to promote urban development areas established pursuant to §

15.2-2223.1

. The assessment shall consider all modes of transportation. Such corridors shall be planned to include multimodal transportation improvements, and the plan shall consider corridor location in planning for any major transportation infrastructure, including environmental impacts and the comprehensive land use plan of the locality in which the corridor is planned. In the designation of such corridors, the Board shall not be constrained by local, district, regional, or modal plans.The Statewide Transportation Plan shall be updated as needed but no less than once every four years. The plan shall promote economic development and all transportation modes, intermodal connectivity, environmental quality, accessibility for people and freight, resiliency, and transportation safety.

The Statewide Transportation Plan shall establish goals, objectives, and priorities that cover at least a 20-year planning horizon, in accordance with federal transportation planning requirements. The plan shall include quantifiable measures and achievable goals relating to, but not limited to, congestion reduction and safety, transit and high-occupancy vehicle facility use, job-to-housing ratios, job and housing access to transit and pedestrian facilities, air quality, movement of freight by rail, and per capita vehicle miles traveled. The Board shall consider such goals in evaluating and selecting transportation improvement projects for inclusion in the Six-Year Improvement Program pursuant to §

33.2-214

.

The plan shall incorporate the measures and goals of the approved long-range plans developed by the applicable regional organizations. Each such plan shall be summarized in a public document and made available to the general public upon presentation to the Governor and General Assembly.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that this plan assess transportation needs and assign priorities to projects on a statewide basis, avoiding the production of a plan that is an aggregation of local, district, regional, or modal plans.

The plan shall consider and incorporate, where applicable, wildlife corridors and any recommendation of the Wildlife Corridor Action Plan developed pursuant to § 29.1-579.

History.

1985, c. 320, § 33.1-23.03; 2001, cc. 764, 772; 2002, c. 639; 2007, c. 896; 2009, cc. 670, 690, 864, 871; 2011, cc. 104, 164; 2014, c. 805; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 51, 52, 498.

Cross references.

As to goals of the Office of Intermodal Planning and Investment of the Secretary of Transportation, generally, see §

2.2-229

.

As to comprehensive plan prepared and adopted by local planning commission, see §

15.2-2223

.

Editor’s note.

Former § 33.1-23.03, from which this section was derived, was enacted as § 33.1-23.02 by Acts 1985, c. 320, and subsequently renumbered at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2009, cc. 670 and 690, cl. 2 provides: “That the Commonwealth Transportation Board, with the assistance of the Office of Intermodal Planning and Investment, may require that appropriate regional organizations develop as part of a long-range plan quantifiable measures and achievable goals for the urban region relating to, but not limited to, congestion reduction and safety, transit and high-occupancy vehicle (HOV) usage, job-to-housing ratios, job and housing access to transit and pedestrian facilities, air quality, movement of freight by rail, and per capita vehicle miles traveled.”

Acts 2009, cc. 670 and 690, cl. 3 provides: “That the designation of the transportation corridors under this act shall be in sufficient detail so that the local jurisdictions can place them on their comprehensive plans.”

Acts 2009, cc. 670 and 690, cl. 4 provides: “That the Commonwealth Transportation Board shall conduct public hearings as it deems appropriate in order to prepare the Statewide Transportation Plan.”

Acts 2009, cc. 670 and 690, cl. 5 provides: “Subject to compliance with federal and state law and regulations and the allocation of funds, that once the corridors are established, the Commonwealth shall begin the appropriate environmental studies and such information may be used in a program to invite possible construction and improvement to the corridor through a public-private partnership. The development of environmental studies shall be prioritized by corridor based on criteria established by the Commonwealth Transportation Board.”

Acts 2011, cc. 104 and 164, cl. 2 provides: “That, notwithstanding the amendments to subsection A of § 33.1-23.03 contained in this act, the Statewide Transportation Plan shall next be updated and presented to the Governor and the General Assembly no later than December 1, 2013, and the subsequent Statewide Transportation Plan update shall be presented to the Governor and the General Assembly no later than December 1, 2015.”

Acts 2014, c. 726, cl. 6 provides: “That, for Northern Virginia and Hampton Roads highway construction districts, the Commonwealth Transportation Board, pursuant to subdivision B 3 of § 33.1-23.5:5 as created by this act, shall ensure that congestion mitigation, consistent with § 33.1-13.03:1 of the Code of Virginia, is weighted highest among the factors in the prioritization process. For metropolitan planning areas with a population over 200,000, the prioritization process shall also include a factor based on the quantifiable and achievable goals pursuant to subsection B of § 33.1-23.03 of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 51 and 52, cl. 2 provides: “That the Commissioner of Highways shall ensure resiliency is incorporated into the design standards for new construction projects.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 51 and 52, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and inserted “resiliency,” in the second paragraph of subsection A.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 498, effective July 1, 2021, added subsection E.

§ 33.2-354.
Commonwealth Transportation Board to develop and update Statewide Pedestrian Policy.

The Board shall develop and update as needed a Statewide Pedestrian Policy. The Board shall:

Provide opportunities for receipt of comments, suggestions, and information from local governments, business and civic organizations, and other concerned parties;

Identify and evaluate needs at statewide, regional, and local levels for additional facilities required to promote pedestrian access to schools, places of employment and recreation, and major activity centers;

Consider and evaluate potential ways of meeting these needs; and

Set forth conclusions as to goals, objectives, and strategies to meet these needs in a safety-conscious manner.

The Board shall coordinate the development of the Statewide Pedestrian Policy with that of the Statewide Transportation Plan provided for in §

33.2-353

and cover the same 20-year planning horizon. The Statewide Pedestrian Policy shall be summarized in a public document and made available to the general public upon presentation to the Governor and General Assembly, either in combination with the Statewide Transportation Plan or as a separate document.

History.

2002, c. 453, § 33.1-23.03:001; 2014, c. 805.

Cross references.

As to designation of public highways for golf cart and utility vehicle operations, see § 46.2-916.2.

§ 33.2-355.
Goals for addressing transportation needs of populations with limited mobility.

The Board, in cooperation with other local, regional, or statewide agencies and entities vested with transportation planning responsibilities, shall establish specific mobility goals for addressing the transportation needs of populations with limited mobility, including the elderly, persons with disabilities that limit their mobility, persons not served by any form of mass transit, and those who, for whatever reasons, cannot afford motor vehicles or cannot be licensed to drive them. Such goals, once established, shall be considered in the development and implementation of the Statewide Transportation Plan required by §

33.2-353

.

History.

2006, cc. 395, 508, § 33.1-23.03:002; 2014, c. 805.

Editor’s note.

The section above was enacted as § 33.1-23.03:0001 by Acts 2006, cc. 395 and 508, and subsequently renumbered at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission as § 33.1-23.03:002, the precursor to this section.

§ 33.2-356.
Funding for extraordinary repairs.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this Code, the Board has the authority to provide, from revenues available for construction programs pursuant to §

33.2-358

, except for revenues pledged to secure any bonds issued for transportation purposes, for exceptionally heavy expenditures for repairs or replacements made necessary by highway damage resulting from extraordinary accidents, vandalism, weather conditions, or acts of God as well as to respond to federal funding initiatives that require matching funds.

History.

1986, Sp. Sess., c. 13, § 33.1-23.03:6; 2014, c. 805; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

Editor’s note.

Former § 33.1-23.03:6, from which this section was derived, was enacted as § 33.1-23.03:1 F by Acts 1986, Sp. Sess., c. 13, and subsequently renumbered at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, and substituted “construction programs pursuant to §

33.2-358

” for “highway capital improvements under.”

§ 33.2-357.
Revenue-sharing funds for systems in certain localities.

From revenues made available by the General Assembly and appropriated for the improvement, construction, reconstruction, or maintenance of the systems of state highways, the Board may make an equivalent matching allocation to any locality for designations by the governing body of up to $5 million for use by the locality to improve, construct, maintain, or reconstruct the highway systems within such locality with up to $2.5 million for use by the locality to maintain the highway systems within such locality. After adopting a resolution supporting the action, the governing body of the locality may request revenue-sharing funds to improve, construct, reconstruct, or maintain a highway system located in another locality or between two or more localities or to bring subdivision streets, used as such prior to the date specified in §

33.2-335

, up to standards sufficient to qualify them for inclusion in the primary or secondary state highway system. All requests for funding shall be accompanied by a prioritized listing of specified projects.

In allocating funds under this section, the Board shall give priority to projects as follows: first, to projects that have previously received an allocation of funds pursuant to this section; second, to projects that (i) meet a transportation need identified in the Statewide Transportation Plan pursuant to §

33.2-353

or (ii) accelerate a project in a locality’s capital plan; and third, to projects that address pavement resurfacing and bridge rehabilitation projects where the maintenance needs analysis determines that the infrastructure does not meet the Department’s maintenance performance targets.

The Department shall contract with the locality for the implementation of the project. Such contract may cover either a single project or may provide for the locality’s implementation of several projects. The locality shall undertake implementation of the particular project by obtaining the necessary permits from the Department in order to ensure that the improvement is consistent with the Department’s standards for such improvements. At the request of the locality, the Department may provide the locality with engineering, right-of-way acquisition, construction, or maintenance services for a project with its own forces. The locality shall provide payment to the Department for any such services. If administered by the Department, such contract shall also require that the governing body of the locality pay to the Department within 30 days the local revenue-sharing funds upon written notice by the Department of its intent to proceed. Any project having funds allocated under this program shall be initiated in such a fashion that at least a portion of such funds have been expended within one year of allocation. Any revenue-sharing funds for projects not initiated after two subsequent fiscal years of allocation may be reallocated at the discretion of the Board.

Total Commonwealth funds allocated by the Board under this section shall not exceed the greater of $100 million or seven percent of funds available for distribution pursuant to subsection B of §

33.2-358

prior to the distribution of funds pursuant to this section, whichever is greater, in each fiscal year, subject to appropriation for such purpose. For any fiscal year in which less than the full program allocation has been allocated by the Board to specific governing bodies, those localities requesting the maximum allocation under subsection A may be allowed an additional allocation at the discretion of the Board.

The funds allocated by the Board under this section shall be distributed and administered in accordance with the revenue-sharing program guidelines established by the Board.

History.

2006, c. 827, § 33.1-23.05; 2008, c. 608; 2011, cc. 830, 868; 2012, cc. 729, 733; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 684; 2018, c. 828; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684 rewrote subsection B, which read “In allocating funds under this section, the Board shall give priority first to allocations that will accelerate projects in the Board’s Six-Year Improvement Program or the locality’s capital plan and next to those pavement resurfacing and bridge rehabilitation projects where the maintenance needs analysis determines that the infrastructure is below the Department’s maintenance performance targets.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 828, in subsection A, substituted “$5” for “$10” and “$2.5” for “$5” and inserted “maintain” in the first sentence; in subsection D, substituted “not exceed the greater of $100 million or seven percent of funds available for distribution pursuant to subsection D of §

33.2-358

prior to the distribution of funds pursuant to this section, whichever is greater” for “be no less than $15 million and no more than $200 million.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, and substituted “subsection B” for “subsection D” in subsection B.

§ 33.2-358.
Allocation of funds to programs.

The Board shall allocate each year from all funds made available for highway purposes such amount as it deems reasonable and necessary for the maintenance of roads within the Interstate System, the primary state highway system, and the secondary state highway system and for city and town street maintenance payments made pursuant to §

33.2-319

and payments made to counties that have withdrawn or elect to withdraw from the secondary state highway system pursuant to §

33.2-366

.

After funds are set aside for administrative and general expenses and pursuant to other provisions in this title that provide for the disposition of funds prior to allocation for construction programs, and after allocation is made pursuant to subsection A, the Board shall allocate all remaining funds, including funds apportioned pursuant to 23 U.S.C. § 104, or any successor programs, as follows:

Thirty percent of the remaining funds to state of good repair purposes as set forth in §

33.2-369

;

Twenty percent of the remaining funds to the high-priority projects program established pursuant to §

33.2-370

;

Twenty percent of the remaining funds to the highway construction district grant programs established pursuant to §

33.2-371

;

Twenty percent of the remaining funds to the Interstate Operations and Enhancement Program established pursuant to §

33.2-372

; and

Ten percent of the remaining funds to the Virginia Highway Safety Improvement Program established pursuant to §

33.2-373

.

The funds allocated in subsection B shall not include the following funds: Congestion Mitigation Air Quality funds apportioned to the state pursuant to 23 U.S.C. § 104(b)(4), or any successor program, and any state matching funds; Surface Transportation Block Grant set-aside for Transportation Alternatives pursuant to 23 U.S.C. § 213, or any successor program, and any state matching funds; Surface Transportation Block Grant Program funds subject to 23 U.S.C. § 133(d)(1)(A)(i), or any successor program, and any state matching funds; and funds received pursuant to federal programs established by the federal government after June 30, 2020, with specific rules that include major restrictions on the types of projects that may be funded, excluding restrictions on the location of projects with regard to highway functional or administrative classification or population, provided such funds are under the control of the Board.

In addition, the Board, from funds appropriated for such purpose in the general appropriation act, shall allocate additional funds to the Cities of Newport News, Norfolk, and Portsmouth and the County of Warren in such manner and apportion such funds among such localities as the Board may determine, unless otherwise provided in the general appropriation act. The localities shall use such funds to address highway maintenance and repair needs created by or associated with port operations in those localities.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the General Assembly may, through the general appropriation act, permit the Governor to increase the amounts to be allocated to highway maintenance, highway construction, either or both.

History.

1977, c. 578, § 33.1-23.1; 1979, c. 84; 1985, c. 42; 1986, c. 572; 2006, c. 937; 2007, c. 305; 2012, cc. 729, 733; 2014, cc. 87, 290, 741, 805; 2015, cc. 676, 684; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, cc. 87 and 741 amended § 33.1-23.1, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, the 2014 amendments by cc. 87 and 741 have been given effect in this section, are identical, and in subsection C, by inserting “and municipality maintained primary extension,” made related changes, and substituting “50” for “200” in subsection C.

Acts 2014, c. 290 amended § 33.1-23.1, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2014, c. 290 has been given effect by substituting the definition of “High-tech infrastucture improvements” for the definition of “smart roadway technology” and substituting “the Innovation and Technology Transportation Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1531

for high-tech infrastructure improvements” for “smart roadway technology” in clause (vi) of subsection C.

Acts 2014, c. 726, cl. 5 provides “That the Commonwealth Transportation Board in implementing § 33.1-23.5:5 as created by this act shall comply with the allocation of funds pursuant to § 33.1-23.1.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 447 B, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding §

33.2-358

, Code of Virginia, the proceeds from the lease or sale of surplus and residue property purchased under this program in excess of related costs shall be applied to the State of Good Repair Program pursuant to §

33.2-369

, Code of Virginia. Proceeds must be used on Federal Title 23 eligible projects.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 676, effective July 1, 2016, inserted “or improving” in clause (v) of subsection C.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684 rewrote subsection C; added subsections D and E; redesignated former subsections D and E as subsections F and G.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, and rewrote the section.

Law Review.

For essay, “Modern Transportation Needs and the Prohibitions of Article X, Section 10 of the Virginia Constitution,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2012).

§ 33.2-359.
Unpaved secondary highway funds.

Funds from the highway construction district grant programs established pursuant to §

33.2-371

shall be allocated for the improvement of nonsurface treated secondary highways that carry 50 or more vehicles per day. Funds shall be deducted from the allocation made to each highway construction district pursuant to subsection D of §

33.2-371

and such deduction shall be based on the ratio of nonsurface treated secondary highways in each highway construction district that carry 50 or more vehicles per day to the total number of such nonsurface treated secondary highways in the Commonwealth.Total funds of the Commonwealth allocated by the Board under this section shall not exceed $25 million annually.

Such funds shall be distributed to counties in the secondary state highway system based on the ratio of nonsurface treated roads in each county carrying 50 vehicles or more per day to the total number of such nonsurface treated roads in the Commonwealth.

History.

1979, c. 84, § 33.1-23.1:1; 1985, c. 42; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 684.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684 rewrote the section.

§ 33.2-360.
Allocation of funds for interstate match.

Until July 1, 2020, after making the allocations provided for in subsection B of §

33.2-358

, a fund shall be established for matching federal-aid interstate funds.

This fund shall be established annually by allocating to it all federal-aid interstate matching funds needed for the year.

History.

1985, c. 42, § 33.1-23.1:2; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 684.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684 substituted “Until July 1, 2020, after” for “After”; deleted “but before making any allocations under subdivisions C 1, 2, and 3 of §

33.2-358

” before “a fund”; deleted “less the total amount of highway construction district primary allocations for the interstate federal-aid match allocated under subsection B of §

33.2-361

” at the end.

§§ 33.2-361,
33.2-362.
Repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 684, cl. 5.

Editor’s note.

Former §

33.2-361

, allocation of construction funds for primary state highway system and interstate match, derived from Acts 1977, c. 578, § 33.1-23.2; 1984, c. 748; 1985, c. 42; 2007, cc. 146, 178; 2014, c. 805.

Former § 33.2-362, allocation of construction funds for urban system highways, derived from Acts 1977, c. 578, § 33.1-23.3; 1985, c. 42; 1987, cc. 523, 536, 545; 1989, c. 303; 1997, c. 494; 2001, c. 590; 2002, cc. 575, 598, 673; 2003, cc. 288, 870; 2009, cc. 52, 693; 2011, c. 400; 2014, c. 805.

Acts 2015, c. 684, cl. 7 provides: “That the repeal of §§

33.2-348

,

33.2-361

, 33.2-362, and

33.2-364

of the Code of Virginia shall not affect the expenditure of funds that are allocated pursuant to those sections by July 1, 2016.”

§ 33.2-363.
Construction of U.S. Route 29 bypass.

If the construction of a U.S. Route 29 bypass around any city located in any county that both (i) is located outside Planning District 8 and (ii) operates under the county executive form of government is not constructed because of opposition from a metropolitan planning organization, and the Federal Highway Administration requires the Commonwealth to reimburse the federal government for federal funds expended in connection with such project, an amount equal to the amount of such reimbursement shall be deducted by the Board from funds allocated or allocable to the highway construction district in which the project was located. Furthermore, in the event of such nonconstruction, an amount equal to the total of all state funds expended on such project shall be deducted by the Board from funds allocated or allocable to the highway construction district in which the project was located.

History.

2004, c. 1025, § 33.1-223.2:13; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 684.

Editor’s note.

Former § 33.1-223.2:13, from which this section was derived, was enacted as § 33.1-223.2:9 by Acts 2004, c. 1025, and subsequently renumbered at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684 deleted “primary state highway system construction” following “Board from” twice.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

If the Charlottesville-Albemarle Metropolitan Planning Organization removes the U.S. Route 29 Bypass from its Six-Year Transportation Improvement Plan

and the Federal Highway Administration requires the Commonwealth to reimburse the funds spent on the Bypass, an amount equal to such reimbursement would be deducted from the primary system highway construction funds for the Department of Transportation district in which the Bypass is located. Further, an amount equal to all state funds expended on the Bypass would be deducted from the primary system highway construction funds allocated to such district. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Stephen D. Newman, Member, Senate of Virginia, 07-069 (10/4/07) (decided under prior law).

§ 33.2-364.
Repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 684, cl. 5.

Editor’s note.

Former §

33.2-364

, allocation of construction funds within secondary state highway system, derived from Acts 1977, c. 578, § 33.1-23.4; 1978, c. 145; 1985, c. 42; 2003, c. 887; 2004,
c. 791; 2007, c. 153; 2014, c. 805.

Acts 2015, c. 684, cl. 7 provides: “That the repeal of §§

33.2-348

,

33.2-361

, 33.2-362, and

33.2-364

of the Code of Virginia shall not affect the expenditure of funds that are allocated pursuant to those sections by July 1, 2016.”

§ 33.2-365.
Allocation of proceeds of Commonwealth of Virginia Transportation Capital Projects Revenue Bonds.

The Board shall allocate, use, and distribute the proceeds of any bonds it is authorized to issue on or after July 1, 2007, pursuant to subdivision 10 of §

33.2-1701

, as follows:

A minimum of 20 percent of the bond proceeds shall be used for transit capital as further described in §

33.2-1526.2

.

A minimum of 4.3 percent of the bond proceeds shall be used for rail capital consistent with the provisions of §§

33.2-1526.2

and

33.2-1602

.

The remaining amount of bond proceeds shall be used for paying the costs incurred or to be incurred for construction of transportation projects with such bond proceeds used or allocated as follows: (i) first, to match federal highway funds projected to be made available and allocated to highway and public transportation capital projects to the extent determined by the Board, for purposes of allowing additional state construction funds to be allocated pursuant to §

33.2-358

; (ii) second, to provide any required funding to fulfill the Commonwealth’s allocation of equivalent revenue sharing matching funds pursuant to §

33.2-357

to the extent determined by the Board; and (iii) third, to pay or fund the costs of statewide or regional projects throughout the Commonwealth. Costs incurred or to be incurred for construction or funding of these transportation projects shall include environmental and engineering studies; rights-of-way acquisition; improvements to all modes of transportation; acquisition, construction, and related improvements; and any financing costs or other financing expenses relating to such bonds. Such costs may include the payment of interest on such bonds for a period during construction and not exceeding one year after completion of construction of the relevant project.

The total amount of bonds authorized shall be used for purposes of applying the percentages in subdivisions 1, 2, and 3.

History.

2007, c. 896, § 33.1-23.4:01; 2011, cc. 830, 868; 2013, c. 639; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 684; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684 substituted “allocated pursuant to §

33.2-358

” for “allocated to the primary, urban, and secondary highway systems pursuant to subdivisions C 1, 2, and 3 of §

33.2-358

” in subdivision 3.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, and substituted “§

33.2-1526.2

” for “subdivision A 4 c of §

58.1-638

” in subdivision 1; and substituted “§§

33.2-1526.2

” for “§§

33.2-1601

” in subdivision 2.

§ 33.2-366.
Funds for counties that have withdrawn or elect to withdraw from the secondary state highway system.

Pursuant to subsection A of §

33.2-358

, the Board shall make the following payments to counties that have withdrawn or elect to withdraw from the secondary state highway system under the provisions of § 11 of Chapter 415 of the Acts of Assembly of 1932 and that have not elected to return: to any county having withdrawn prior to June 30, 1985, and having an area greater than 100 square miles, an amount equal to $12,529 per lane-mile for fiscal year 2014, and to any county having an area less than 100 square miles, an amount equal to $17,218 per lane-mile for fiscal year 2014; to any county that elects to withdraw after June 30, 1985, the Board shall establish a rate per lane-mile for the first year using (i) an amount for maintenance based on maintenance standards and unit costs used by the Department to prepare its secondary state highway system maintenance budget for the year in which the county withdraws and (ii) an amount for administration equal to five percent of the maintenance figure determined in clause (i). The payment rates shall be adjusted annually by the Board in accordance with procedures established for adjusting payments to cities and towns under §

33.2-319

, and lane mileage shall be adjusted annually to include (a) streets and highways accepted for maintenance in the county system by the local governing body or (b) streets and highways constructed according to standards set forth in the county subdivision ordinance or county thoroughfare plan, and being not less than the standards set by the Department. Such counties shall be eligible to receive allocations pursuant to subsection B of §

33.2-358

.

Payment of the funds shall be made in four equal sums, one in each quarter of the fiscal year.

The chief administrative officer of such counties receiving such funds shall make annual reports of expenditures to the Board, in such form as the Board shall prescribe, accounting for all expenditures, including delineation between construction and maintenance expenditures and reporting on their performance as specified in subsection B of §

33.2-352

. Such reports shall be included in the scope of the annual audit of each county conducted by independent certified public accountants.

History.

1985, c. 42, § 33.1-23.5:1; 2004, c. 118; 2013, c. 766; 2013, Sp. Sess. I, c. 1; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 684; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684 substituted “be eligible to receive allocations pursuant to subsection C or D of §

33.2-358

” for “in addition, each receive for construction from funds allocated pursuant to subdivision C 3 of §

33.2-358

an annual amount calculated in the same manner as payments for construction in the secondary state highway system are calculated” at the end of the first paragraph; deleted “and shall be reduced in the case of each such county by the amount of federal-aid construction funds credited to each such county” at the end of the second paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, and in the first paragraph, substituted “subsection A” for “subsection B” and “subsection B” for “subsection C or D.”

§ 33.2-367.
Highway aid to mass transit.

In allocating highway funds, the Board may use such funds for highway aid to mass transit facilities when such use will best accomplish the purpose of serving the transportation needs of the greatest number of people.

Highway aid to mass transit may be accomplished by (i) using highway funds to aid in paying transit operating costs borne by localities; (ii) acquiring or constructing transit-related highway facilities such as exclusive bus lanes; bus turn-outs; bus passenger shelters; fringe parking facilities, including necessary access roads, to promote transit use and relieve highway congestion; and off-street parking facilities to permit exclusive use of curb lane by buses; or (iii) permitting mass transit facilities to occupy highway median strips without the reimbursement required by §

33.2-1015

, all to the end that highway traffic may be relieved through the development of more efficient mass transit.

Expenditures pursuant to this section shall be made from funds available for the construction of state highways within the highway construction district in which the transit facilities are wholly or partly located.

The Board may contract with the governing bodies constituting a transportation district, or in its discretion, other local governing bodies, for the accomplishment of a project to which funds have been allocated under the provisions of this section. Whenever such projects are being financed by advance annual allocation of funds, the Board may make such funds available to the contracting governing bodies in annual increments that may be used for other transit purposes until needed for the project for which allocated; however, the Board may require bond or other satisfactory assurance of final completion of the contract.

The Board may also, at the request of local governing bodies, use funds allocated for urban highways or secondary highways within their jurisdiction to accomplish the purposes of this section.

The General Assembly may, through the general appropriation act, provide for (i) limits on the amounts or purposes of allocations made under this section and (ii) the transfer of allocations from one eligible recipient to another.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-35.8; 1970, c. 503, § 33.1-1; 1972, c. 490; 1973, c. 508, § 33.1-46.1; 1977, c. 578; 1980, c. 373; 1986, c. 392; 1998, cc. 905, 907; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-368.
Financial plans for transportation construction projects.

For transportation construction projects valued in excess of $100 million, the Commissioner of Highways shall require that a financial plan be prepared and presented to the Board for its review. This plan shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (i) a complete cost estimate for all major project elements, (ii) an implementation plan with the project schedule and cost-to-complete information presented for each year, (iii) identified revenues by funding source available each year to meet project costs, (iv) a detailed cash-flow analysis for each year of the proposed project, and (v) efforts to be made to ensure maximum involvement of private enterprise and private capital.

History.

2013, cc. 585, 646, § 33.1-23.5:3; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-369.
State of good repair.

As used in this section, “state of good repair purposes” means improvement of deficient pavement conditions and improvement of structurally deficient bridges.

The Board shall use funds allocated in §

33.2-358

and §

58.1-1741

to state of good repair purposes for reconstruction and replacement of structurally deficient state and locally owned bridges and reconstruction and rehabilitation of pavement on the Interstate System and primary state highway system determined to be deteriorated by the Board, including municipality-maintained primary extensions.The Board shall allocate these funds to projects in all nine highway construction districts for state of good repair purposes based on a priority ranking system that takes into consideration (i) the number, condition, and costs of structurally deficient bridges and (ii) the mileage, condition, and costs to replace deteriorated pavements. The Board shall ensure an equitable needs-based distribution of funding among the highway construction districts, with no district receiving more than 17.5 percent or less than 5.5 percent of the total funding allocated in any given year. The Board may, by a duly adopted resolution, waive the cap provided in this section for a fiscal year only when it determines that due to extraordinary circumstances or needs the cap inhibits the ability of the Department to address a key pavement or bridge need that has been identified.

In any year in which the Department has not met the established targets for secondary pavements developed in accordance with §

33.2-232

and before making the allocations in subsection B, the Board may allocate up to 20 percent of these funds to all nine highway construction districts to improve the condition of secondary pavements. The Board shall ensure an equitable needs-based distribution of funds among highway construction districts based on the mileage, condition, and cost to improve secondary pavements.

History.

2015, c. 684.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, c. 684, cl. 2 provides: “That the Commonwealth Transportation Board shall develop the priority ranking system pursuant to §

33.2-369

as added by this act by July 1, 2016.”